Utah statutes.
78B-6-1242.   Interests of minor -- Payment to guardian.

If the share of a minor is sold, the court may order the proceeds of the sale to be paid by the referee making the sale to the minor's general guardian or to the special guardian appointed for the minor in the action.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

